Tennessee, session 114, HB2001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-109(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section, which must be
proven by a preponderance of the evidence, that the person infected with HIV was in
compliance with a treatment regime prescribed by the person's healthcare provider to
medically suppress the risk of HIV transmission.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2001
011315
- 1 -